Massachusetts, session 194th, H3368.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There is hereby established a special commission to investigate and study
the feasibility of establishing a municipal building finance authority.
SECTION 2. The commission shall: (1) consider recommendations from state and federal
reports, relative to the establishment of a municipal building finance authority; (2) identify and
consider state and private funding sources with consideration for providing grants and loans to
cities and towns for the planning, design, and construction of municipal buildings; (3) assess
innovative financing approaches for assisting municipalities in the planning and construction of
municipal buildings including, but not limited to, councils-on-aging facilities, public safety
facilities, town halls, and other municipal buildings or facilities; and (4) determine specific
of 2

powers of a municipal building finance authority including but not limited to (a) establishing
grant programs, (b) providing architectural or other technical advice and assistance to
municipalities, general contractors, subcontractors, construction or project managers, designers
and others in the planning, maintenance and establishment of municipal facilities; (c) perform or
commission a needs survey to ascertain the capital construction, reconstruction, maintenance and
other capital needs for municipal facilities in the commonwealth, and (d) recommend to the
general court legislation as necessary to further the purposes of establishing a municipal building
finance authority.
SECTION 2. The municipal building finance commission shall be comprised of the
following 13 members: 2 members of the senate appointed by the senate president; 2 members of
the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house; 1 member of the senate and 1
member of the house of representatives appointed by the minority leader of each; the state
treasurer or a designee, the secretary of administration and finance or a designee, the secretary of
public safety and security or a designee, the secretary of elder affairs or a designee; the secretary
of housing and economic development or a designee; the executive director of the school
building authority or a designee and a representative of the Massachusetts Municipal
Association.
The members of the commission shall be appointed not later than 90 days after the
effective date of this act and shall serve until the completion of the report.
SECTION 3. The commission shall report to the general court the results of its study
together with recommendations and drafts of legislation by filing the same with the clerks of the
senate and the house of representatives on or before December 31, 2023.
of 2